District of Columbia statutes.
8-671.07

Recording.

(a)

An environmental covenant and any amendment or termination of the covenant must be recorded with District of Columbia Recorder of Deeds. For purposes of indexing, a holder shall be treated as a grantee.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in § 8-671.08(c), an environmental covenant is subject to the laws of the District governing recording and priority of interests in real property.

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-95, § 107, 53 DCR 1652
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act.